Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 9. Industrial Plant Training

§ 57-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Industrial Training Law of 1964.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-11; Laws, 1964, ch. 220, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1964).

§ 57-9-3.
Declaration of public policy.

It is hereby declared that the state public welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

That a balanced economic development of this state is essential.

That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right of gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose, the development within Mississippi of trade preparatory or industrial plant training and recruitment program for the various commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises.

That the means and measures herein authorized to promote said commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises, are as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of increasing gainful employment and business activities of the municipalities, counties, and supervisors districts of Mississippi, hereinafter called “municipalities.”

That the currently existing critical gap in the employment and use of skilled and semiskilled residents of the state resulting from deficient training programs and facilities be eliminated, and that the proper promotion of the health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right of gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state demands the enactment of the program herein authorized.

That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized will stimulate and provide ready and attractive employment for the skilled and semiskilled residents of the state through the proper increase of the skilled and semiskilled labor force available which will further develop the agricultural, commercial, industrial and other resources of the state for the general welfare.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-12; Laws, 1964, ch. 220, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1964).

§ 57-9-5.
Plans for industrial plant training and recruitment; industrial revolving fund.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, hereinafter referred to as the “board,” is hereby authorized and empowered to formulate and place into existence, plans for industrial plant training and recruitment for new and expanded industries, or both, in Mississippi. To that end, there is hereby created and provided within the board, in addition to all other funds that may be appropriated to the board, an “industrial revolving fund,” and all sums of monies received or obtained by the board under the provisions of this chapter, by appropriation or otherwise, shall be paid into the State Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall deposit said monies into the industrial revolving fund. All expenditures therefrom shall be authorized by the board in the manner hereinafter set forth and such expenditures shall be paid therefrom by the State Treasurer on warrants of the auditor of public accounts; and said auditor shall issue his warrant upon requisition properly signed by the director and secretary of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-13; Laws, 1964, ch. 220, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1964).

§ 57-9-7.
Issuance of certificate of public convenience and necessity and loan of funds to municipalities.

Any municipality, hereinafter referred to as “the applicant,” may, on behalf of any new or expanded industry, or both, in Mississippi, apply to the board for a loan, not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) for any one (1) new or one (1)expanded industry, which funds shall be used exclusively for the purposes of preparatory or industrial plant training and recruitment. The board is authorized and empowered to determine whether the public convenience and necessity requires that the application therefor be approved or denied, and what amount, if any, should be loaned by the board to the applicant for said new or expanded industry. For the purpose of administering provisions of this chapter, the board shall establish reasonable rules and regulations to be followed by the applicant in making application for loans hereby authorized. The board shall investigate, find and determine as to whether a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be issued and contract for a loan of funds to the applicant shall be made. In considering and determining whether or not such certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be issued and whether a loan shall be made or not, the board shall find and determine, to include, but not be limited to, the following:

That the net worth of the new or expanded industry, on behalf of which the municipality is making said application, meets the prerequisites and requirements of the board. The applicant shall furnish upon request to the board such information with regard to the new or expanded industry’s net worth as may be required by the board.

That the new or expanded industry, on behalf of which the municipality is making such application, shall submit along with the applicant, a detailed and complete study of its training needs, plans, and total amount of funds to be used for industrial training and preparatory training only, and the same shall appear to be feasible and practicable to the board.

That the new or expanded industry, on behalf of which the municipality is making such application, shall submit a plan of repayment, along with the applicant, and which repayment shall be made within five (5) years after the loan, and such plan shall be approved by the board.

When the board shall have determined said facts favorably, it is authorized and empowered, having due regard to the promotion of the public policy and general welfare herein declared, to issue or refuse to issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity to the applicant, approve or disapprove the loan of any part or all of the funds requested by the applicant. If and when said certificate is issued, and if and when said loan is approved, the board therein shall fix and determine:

The amount of monies to be loaned.

The time, amount, and method of repayment.

The method, manner, and what legally valid and enforceable documents, promissory notes, deeds of trust, or contracts, or any combination thereof, shall be executed by the applicant and the new or expanded industry.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-14; Laws, 1964, ch. 220, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1964).

§ 57-9-9.
Repayment of loan.

In the event the board shall issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity to the applicant, and approve a loan of a sum, such sum as approved to be loaned, shall be disbursed to the applicant upon the execution of a legally valid and enforceable promissory note, deed of trust, or contract, or any combination thereof, by the new or expanded industry and the applicant, in accordance with the approved plan of repayment. In the event a contract is required by the plan of repayment, the board is authorized to join in the execution thereof. The board is further authorized to require such provisions and covenants in such promissory note, deed of trust, or contract, or any combination thereof, deemed reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and require the repayment of said loans. The board and municipalities are further authorized to institute suit, at law or equity, to cause the repayment of such loans, and to protect the interest of the State of Mississippi, and may employ private counsel to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-15; Laws, 1964, ch. 220, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1964).